Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.139

Insurance and workers' compensation for offenders performing community restitution.

The legislative authority of a county may purchase liability insurance in an amount it deems reasonable to protect the county, its officers, and employees against liability for the wrongful acts of offenders or injury or damage incurred by offenders in the course of community restitution imposed by court order or pursuant to RCW 13.40.080. The legislative authority of a county may elect to treat offenders as employees and/or workers under Title 51 RCW.

[ 2002 c 175 s 32; 1984 c 24 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.

Workers' compensation coverage of offenders performing community restitution: RCW 51.12.045.